Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.195

Test or assessment scores—Adjustments to instructional practices—Notification to parents.

(1) If students' scores on the test or assessments under RCW 28A.655.070 indicate that students need help in identified areas, the school district shall evaluate its instructional practices and make appropriate adjustments.

(2) Each school district shall notify the parents of each student of their child's performance on the test and assessments conducted under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 217 s 1; 1999 c 373 s 603; 1992 c 141 s 401.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 373: See note following RCW 28A.300.310.

Findings—Part headings—Severability—1992 c 141: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.